Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 18. Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995.
§ 33.2-1806.
Dedication of public property.

Any public entity may dedicate any property interest that it has for public use as a qualified transportation facility if it finds that so doing will serve the public purpose of this chapter. In connection with such dedication, a public entity may convey any property interest that it has, subject to the conditions imposed by general law governing such conveyances, to the private entity, subject to the provisions of this chapter, for such consideration as such public entity may determine. The aforementioned consideration may include the agreement of the private entity to develop and/or operate the qualifying transportation facility. The property interests that the public entity may convey to the private entity in connection with a dedication under this section may include licenses, franchises, easements, concessions, or any other right or interest the public entity deems appropriate. Such property interest including a leasehold interest in and/or rights to use real property constituting a qualifying transportation facility shall be considered property indirectly owned by a government if described in §

58.1-3606.1

.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-564; 1995, c. 647; 2005, cc. 504, 562; 2006, c. 922; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1807.
Powers and duties of the private entity.

The private entity shall have all power allowed by law generally to a private entity having the same form of organization as the private entity and shall have the power to develop and/or operate the qualifying transportation facility and impose user fees and/or enter into service contracts in connection with the use thereof. However, no tolls or user fees may be imposed by the private entity on Interstate 81 without the prior approval of the General Assembly. Prior approval of the General Assembly shall also be required prior to the imposition or collection of any toll for use of Interstate 95 south of Fredericksburg pursuant to the Interstate System Reconstruction or Rehabilitation Pilot Program. No private entity may operate a rest area, as defined in §

33.2-1200

, for commercial purposes without the prior approval of the General Assembly.

The private entity may own, lease, or acquire any other right to use or develop and/or operate the qualifying transportation facility.

Subject to applicable permit requirements, the private entity shall have the authority to cross any canal or navigable watercourse so long as the crossing does not unreasonably interfere with then current navigation and use of the waterway.

In operating the qualifying transportation facility, the private entity may:

Make classifications according to reasonable categories for assessment of user fees; and

With the consent of the responsible public entity, make and enforce reasonable rules to the same extent that the responsible public entity may make and enforce rules with respect to a similar transportation facility.

The private entity shall:

Develop and/or operate the qualifying transportation facility in a manner that meets the standards of the responsible public entity for transportation facilities operated and maintained by such responsible public entity, all in accordance with the provisions of the interim agreement or the comprehensive agreement;

Keep the qualifying transportation facility open for use by the members of the public in accordance with the terms and conditions of the interim or comprehensive agreement after its initial opening upon payment of the applicable user fees and/or service payments, provided that the qualifying transportation facility may be temporarily closed because of emergencies or, with the consent of the responsible public entity, to protect the safety of the public or for reasonable construction or maintenance procedures;

Maintain, or provide by contract for the maintenance of, the qualifying transportation facility;

Cooperate with the responsible public entity in establishing any interconnection with the qualifying transportation facility requested by the responsible public entity; and

Comply with the provisions of the interim or comprehensive agreement and any service contract.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-565; 1995, c. 647; 2002, c. 593; 2005, cc. 504, 562; 2008, cc. 602, 838; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 681; 2018, cc. 350, 351.

Cross references.

As to the Toll Facilities Revolving Account, see §

33.2-1529

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 350 and 351, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to or prohibit any program or contract between a private entity and an agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth authorized pursuant to federal law, regulation, or policy as of July 1, 2018.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 681 in subsection A, added the last sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 350 and 351 are identical, and added the last sentence in subsection A. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

§ 33.2-1808.
Comprehensive agreement.

Prior to developing and/or operating the qualifying transportation facility, the private entity shall enter into a comprehensive agreement with the responsible public entity. The comprehensive agreement shall, as appropriate, provide for:

Delivery of performance and payment bonds in connection with the development and/or operation of the qualifying transportation facility, in the forms and amounts satisfactory to the responsible public entity;

Review of plans for the development and/or operation of the qualifying transportation facility by the responsible public entity and approval by the responsible public entity if the plans conform to standards acceptable to the responsible public entity;

Inspection of construction of or improvements to the qualifying transportation facility by the responsible public entity to ensure that such construction or improvements conform to the standards acceptable to the responsible public entity;

Maintenance of a policy or policies of public liability insurance (copies of which shall be filed with the responsible public entity accompanied by proofs of coverage) or self-insurance, each in form and amount satisfactory to the responsible public entity and reasonably sufficient to insure coverage of tort liability to the public and employees and to enable the continued operation of the qualifying transportation facility;

Monitoring of the maintenance practices of the private entity by the responsible public entity and the taking of such actions as the responsible public entity finds appropriate to ensure that the qualifying transportation facility is properly maintained;

Reimbursement to be paid to the responsible public entity for services provided by the responsible public entity;

Filing of appropriate financial statements in a form acceptable to the responsible public entity on a periodic basis;

Compensation to the private entity that may include a reasonable development fee, a reasonable maximum rate of return on investment, and/or reimbursement of development expenses in the event of termination for convenience by the responsible public entity as agreed upon between the responsible public entity and the private entity;

The date of termination of the private entity’s authority and duties under this chapter and dedication to the appropriate public entity; and

Guaranteed cost and completion guarantees related to the development and/or operation of the qualified transportation facility and payment of damages for failure to meet the completion guarantee.

The comprehensive agreement shall provide for such user fees as may be established by agreement of the parties. Any user fees shall be set at a level that takes into account any lease payments, service payments, and compensation to the private entity or as specified in the comprehensive agreement. A copy of any service contract shall be filed with the responsible public entity. A schedule of the current user fees shall be made available by the private entity to any member of the public on request. In negotiating user fees under this section, the parties shall establish fees that are the same for persons using the facility under like conditions except as required by agreement between the parties to preserve capacity and prevent congestion on the qualifying transportation facility. The execution of the comprehensive agreement or any amendment thereto shall constitute conclusive evidence that the user fees provided for therein comply with this chapter. User fees established in the comprehensive agreement as a source of revenues may be in addition to or in lieu of service payments.

In the comprehensive agreement, the responsible public entity may agree to make grants or loans for the development and/or operation of the qualifying transportation facility from amounts received from the federal government or any agency or instrumentality thereof.

The comprehensive agreement shall incorporate the duties of the private entity under this chapter and may contain such other terms and conditions that the responsible public entity determines serve the public purpose of this chapter. Without limitation, the comprehensive agreement may contain provisions under which the responsible public entity agrees to provide notice of default and cure rights for the benefit of the private entity and the persons specified therein as providing financing for the qualifying transportation facility. The comprehensive agreement may contain such other lawful terms and conditions to which the private entity and the responsible public entity mutually agree, including provisions regarding unavoidable delays or provisions providing for a loan of public funds for the development and/or operation of one or more qualifying transportation facilities.

The comprehensive agreement shall provide for the distribution of any earnings in excess of the maximum rate of return as negotiated in the comprehensive agreement. Without limitation, excess earnings may be distributed to the Transportation Trust Fund, to the responsible public entity, or to the private entity for debt reduction or they may be shared with appropriate public entities. Any payments under a concession arrangement for which the Commonwealth is the responsible public entity shall be paid into the Transportation Trust Fund.

Any changes in the terms of the comprehensive agreement, as may be agreed upon by the parties, shall be added to the comprehensive agreement by written amendment.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this chapter, a responsible public entity may enter into a comprehensive agreement with multiple private entities if the responsible public entity determines in writing that it is in the public interest to do so.

The comprehensive agreement may provide for the development and/or operation of phases or segments of the qualifying transportation facility.

Any comprehensive agreement originally entered into on or after July 1, 2017, shall include, in consultation with the Virginia State Police, a provision requiring funding for adequate staffing by the Virginia State Police for general law enforcement services during both development and operation of the qualifying transportation facility. As used in this subsection, “adequate staffing” means a level of staffing in accordance with the September 2003 report, “A Review of the Patrol Staffing Formula” as developed pursuant to Item 459(g) of Chapter 1042 of the Acts of Assembly of 2003.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-566; 1995, c. 647; 2005, cc. 504, 562; 2006, c. 922; 2014, c. 805; 2017, c. 511.

Cross references.

As to designation of high-occupancy toll lanes, see §

33.2-502

.

As to HOT lanes enforcement, see §

33.2-503

.

As to the Toll Facilities Revolving Account, see §

33.2-1529

.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 511 added subsection I.

§ 33.2-1809.
Interim agreement.

Prior to or in connection with the negotiation of the comprehensive agreement, the responsible public entity may enter into an interim agreement with the private entity proposing the development and/or operation of the facility or facilities. Such interim agreement may (i) permit the private entity to commence activities for which it may be compensated relating to the proposed qualifying transportation facility, including project planning and development, advance right-of-way acquisition, design and engineering, environmental analysis and mitigation, survey, conducting transportation and revenue studies, and ascertaining the availability of financing for the proposed facility or facilities; (ii) establish the process and timing of the negotiation of the comprehensive agreement; and (iii) contain any other provisions related to any aspect of the development and/or operation of a qualifying transportation facility that the parties may deem appropriate.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a responsible public entity may enter in to an interim agreement with multiple private entities if the responsible public entity determines in writing that it is in the public interest to do so.

The Department of Transportation, the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority, and the Department of Rail and Public Transportation shall not enter into an interim agreement for the development of a transportation facility under this chapter that either (i) establishes a process and timing of the negotiations of the comprehensive agreement or (ii) allows for competitive negotiations as set forth in §

2.2-4302.2

.

History.

2005, cc. 504, 562, § 56-566.1; 2014, c. 805; 2017, cc. 539, 551; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Cross references.

As to HOT lanes enforcement, see §

33.2-503

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, cc. 539 and 551, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of subsection C of §

33.2-1809

as added by this act shall not apply to any amendment made to any comprehensive agreement originally entered into prior to July 1, 2017.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 539 and 551 are identical, and added subsection C. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and inserted “the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority” following “Department of Transportation” in subsection C.

§ 33.2-1810.
Multiple public entities.

If a private entity submits a proposal pursuant to subsection A of §

33.2-1803

to develop and/or operate a qualifying transportation facility or a multimodal transportation facility that may require approval by more than one public entity, representatives of each of the affected public entities shall, prior to acceptance of such proposal, convene and determine which public entity shall serve as the coordinating responsible public entity. Such determination shall occur within 60 days of the receipt of a proposal by the respective public entities.

If public entities request proposals from private entities for the development and/or operation of a qualifying transportation facility or a multimodal transportation facility pursuant to subsection B of §

33.2-1803

, the determination of which public entity shall serve as the coordinating responsible public entity shall be made prior to any request for proposals.

Once a determination has been made in accordance with subsection A or B, the coordinating responsible public entity and the private entity shall proceed in accordance with this chapter.

History.

2005, cc. 504, 562, § 56-566.2; 2014, c. 805.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Responsible public entity. —

The Virginia Port Authority, pursuant to § 56-557, is the responsible public entity under the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 for any concession of Port facilities because the General Assembly has conferred on it alone the power to develop and/or operate Port facilities and, as a result, the Virginia Port Authority bears statutory responsibility to review and evaluate the proposals received by private entities for the concession of Port facilities, and to do so according to any guidelines adopted by it pursuant to §§ 56-560 and 56-573.1. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012) (decided under prior law).

§ 33.2-1811.
Federal, state, and local assistance.

The responsible public entity may take any action to obtain federal, state, or local assistance for a qualifying transportation facility that serves the public purpose of this chapter and may enter into any contracts required to receive such federal assistance. If the responsible public entity is a state agency, any funds received from the state or federal government or any agency or instrumentality thereof shall be subject to appropriation by the General Assembly. The responsible public entity may determine that it serves the public purpose of this chapter for all or any portion of the costs of a qualifying transportation facility to be paid, directly or indirectly, from the proceeds of a grant or loan made by the federal, state, or local government or any agency or instrumentality thereof.

The responsible public entity may agree to make grants or loans for the development and/or operation of the qualifying transportation facility from amounts received from the federal, state, or local government or any agency or instrumentality thereof.

Nothing in this chapter or in an interim or comprehensive agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed to enlarge, diminish, or affect the authority, if any, otherwise possessed by the responsible public entity to take action that would impact the debt capacity of the Commonwealth or the affected localities or public entities.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-567; 1995, c. 647; 2005, cc. 504, 562; 2014, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to the Toll Facilities Revolving Account, see §

33.2-1529

.

§ 33.2-1812.
Financing.

Any financing of a qualifying transportation facility may be in such amounts and upon such terms and conditions as may be determined by the parties to the interim or comprehensive agreement. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the private entity and the responsible public entity may propose to utilize any and all revenues that may be available to them and may, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law: issue debt, equity, or other securities or obligations; enter into leases, concessions, and grant and loan agreements; access any designated transportation trust funds; borrow or accept grants from any state infrastructure bank; and secure any financing with a pledge of, security interest in, or lien on any or all of its property, including all of its property interests in the qualifying transportation facility.

History.

2005, cc. 504, 562, § 56-567.1; 2006, c. 922; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1813.
Material default; remedies.

Upon the occurrence and during the continuation of material default, the responsible public entity may exercise any or all of the following remedies:

The responsible public entity may elect to take over the transportation facility or facilities and in such case shall succeed to all of the right, title, and interest in such transportation facility or facilities, subject to any liens on revenues previously granted by the private entity to any person providing financing therefor.

The responsible public entity may terminate the interim or comprehensive agreement and exercise any other rights and remedies that may be available at law or in equity.

The responsible public entity may make or cause to be made any appropriate claims under the performance and/or payment bonds required by §

33.2-1808

.

In the event the responsible public entity elects to take over a qualifying transportation facility pursuant to subsection A, the responsible public entity may develop and/or operate the qualifying transportation facility, impose user fees for the use thereof, and comply with any service contracts as if it were the private entity. Any revenues that are subject to a lien shall be collected for the benefit of, and paid to, secured parties, as their interests may appear, to the extent necessary to satisfy the private entity’s obligations to secured parties, including the maintenance of reserves, and such liens shall be correspondingly reduced and, when paid off, released. Before any payments to, or for the benefit of, secured parties, the responsible public entity may use revenues to pay current operation and maintenance costs of the qualifying transportation facility or facilities, including compensation to the responsible public entity for its services in operating and maintaining the qualifying transportation facility. Remaining revenues, if any, after all payments for operation and maintenance of the transportation facility or facilities, and to, or for the benefit of, secured parties, have been made, shall be paid to the private entity, subject to the negotiated maximum rate of return. The right to receive such payment, if any, shall be considered just compensation for the transportation facility or facilities. The full faith and credit of the responsible public entity shall not be pledged to secure any financing of the private entity by the election to take over the qualifying transportation facility. Assumption of operation of the qualifying transportation facility shall not obligate the responsible public entity to pay any obligation of the private entity from sources other than revenues.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-568; 1995, c. 647; 2005, cc. 504, 562; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1814.
Condemnation.

At the request of the private entity, the responsible public entity may exercise any power of condemnation that it has under law for the purpose of acquiring any lands or estates or interests therein to the extent that the responsible public entity finds that such action serves the public purpose of this chapter. Any amounts to be paid in any such condemnation proceeding shall be paid by the private entity.

Except as provided in subsection A, until the Commission, after notice to the private entity and the secured parties, as may appear in the private entity’s records, and an opportunity for hearing, has entered a final declaratory judgment that a material default has occurred and is continuing, the power of condemnation may not be exercised against a qualifying transportation facility.

After the entry of such final order by the Commission, any responsible public entity having the power of condemnation under state law may exercise such power of condemnation, in lieu of or at any time after taking over the transportation facility pursuant to subdivision A 1 of §

33.2-1813

, to acquire the qualifying transportation facility or facilities. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the exercise of the power of condemnation by any responsible public entity against a qualifying transportation facility after the entry by the Commission of a final declaratory judgment order pursuant to subsection B. Any person that has provided financing for the qualifying transportation facility and the private entity, to the extent of its capital investment, may participate in the condemnation proceedings with the standing of a property owner.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-569; 1995, c. 647; 2005, cc. 504, 562; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1815.
Utility crossings.

The private entity and each public service company, public utility, railroad, cable television provider, locality, or political subdivision whose facilities are to be crossed or affected shall cooperate fully with the other in planning and arranging the manner of the crossing or relocation of the facilities. Any such entity possessing the power of condemnation is hereby expressly granted such powers in connection with the moving or relocation of facilities to be crossed by the qualifying transportation facility or that must be relocated to the extent that such moving or relocation is made necessary or desirable by construction of or improvements to the qualifying transportation facility, which shall be construed to include construction of or improvements to temporary facilities for the purpose of providing service during the period of construction or improvement.

Should the private entity and any such public service company, public utility, railroad, and cable television provider be unable to agree upon a plan for the crossing or relocation, the Commission may determine the manner in which the crossing or relocation is to be accomplished and any damages due arising out of the crossing or relocation. The Commission may employ expert engineers who shall examine the location and plans for such crossing or relocation, hear any objections and consider modifications, and make a recommendation to the Commission. In such a case, the cost of the experts is to be borne by the private entity. Any amount to be paid for such crossing, construction, moving, or relocation of facilities shall be paid for by the private entity or any other person contractually responsible therefor under the interim or comprehensive agreement or under any other contract, license, or permit. The Commission shall make a determination within 90 days of notification by the private entity that the qualifying transportation facility will cross utilities subject to the Commission’s jurisdiction.

Should the private entity and any locality or political subdivision not be able to agree upon a plan for the crossing or relocation of facilities owned or operated by the locality or political subdivision, then the private entity may request in writing to the Commonwealth Transportation Board (Board), with a copy to the chief executive or chief administrative officer of the locality or political subdivision, that the Board consider the matter pursuant to its authority in §

33.2-308

, which shall apply mutatis mutandis to any project pursuant to this chapter, regardless of the highway system or location of the project, if the Board decides to exercise such authority, except, however, that the private entity, and not the Board, shall be responsible for the costs of such crossing, construction, moving, or relocation of such facilities. In the event the Board decides to exercise its authority hereunder, the Board shall issue an order within 90 days of receipt of the request from the private entity.

For the purposes of this chapter, “facilities owned or operated by the local government or political subdivision” means any pipes, mains, storm sewers, water lines, sanitary sewers, natural gas facilities, or other structures, equipment, and appliances owned or operated by a locality or political subdivision for the purpose of transmitting or distributing communications, power, electricity, light, heat, gas, oil, crude products, water, steam, sewage or waste, storm water not connected with highway drainage, or any other similar commodity or substance, which facilities directly or indirectly serve the public.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-570; 1995, c. 647; 2005, cc. 504, 562; 2014, cc. 474, 805.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 474 amended former § 56-570, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2014 amendment by c. 474 has been given effect in this section by inserting subsection A and B designators; substituting “cable television provider, locality, or political subdivision” for “and cable television provider,” in subsection A; and adding subsections C and D.

§ 33.2-1816.
Police powers; violations of law.

All police officers of the Commonwealth and of each affected locality or public entity shall have the same powers and jurisdiction within the limits of such qualifying transportation facility as they have in their respective areas of jurisdiction, and such police officers shall have access to the qualifying transportation facility at any time for the purpose of exercising such powers and jurisdiction. This authority does not extend to the private offices, buildings, garages, and other improvements of the private entity to any greater degree than the police power extends to any other private buildings and improvements.

To the extent the transportation facility is a road, bridge, tunnel, overpass, or similar transportation facility for motor vehicles, the traffic and motor vehicle laws of the Commonwealth or, if applicable, any locality or public entity shall be the same as those applying to conduct on similar transportation facilities in the Commonwealth or such locality or public entity. Punishment for offenses shall be as prescribed by law for conduct occurring on similar transportation facilities in the Commonwealth or such locality or public entity.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-571; 1995, c. 647; 2005, cc. 504, 562; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1817.
Dedication of assets.

The responsible public entity shall terminate the private entity’s authority and duties under this chapter on the date set forth in the interim or comprehensive agreement. Upon termination, the authority and duties of the private entity under this chapter shall cease, and the qualifying transportation facility shall be dedicated to the responsible public entity or, if the qualifying transportation facility was initially dedicated by an affected locality or public entity, to such affected locality or public entity for public use.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-572; 1995, c. 647; 2005, cc. 504, 562; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1818.
Sovereign immunity.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as or deemed a waiver of the sovereign immunity of the Commonwealth, any responsible public entity, or any affected locality or public entity or any officer or employee thereof with respect to the participation in or approval of all or any part of the qualifying transportation facility or its operation, including interconnection of the qualifying transportation facility with any other transportation facility. Localities in which a qualifying transportation facility is located shall possess sovereign immunity with respect to its construction and operation.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-573; 1995, c. 647; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1819.
Procurement.

The Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.) shall not apply to this chapter; however, a responsible public entity may enter into an interim or a comprehensive agreement only in accordance with guidelines adopted by it as follows:

A responsible public entity may enter into an interim or a comprehensive agreement in accordance with guidelines adopted by it that are consistent with procurement through “competitive sealed bidding” as set forth in §

2.2-4302.1

and subsection B of §

2.2-4310

.

A responsible public entity may enter into an interim or a comprehensive agreement in accordance with guidelines adopted by it that are consistent with the procurement of “other than professional services” through competitive negotiation as set forth in §

2.2-4302.2

and subsection B of §

2.2-4310

. Such responsible public entity shall not be required to select the proposal with the lowest price offer, but may consider price as one factor in evaluating the proposals received. Other factors that may be considered include (i) the proposed cost of the qualifying transportation facility; (ii) the general reputation, qualifications, industry experience, and financial capacity of the private entity; (iii) the proposed design, operation, and feasibility of the qualifying transportation facility; (iv) the eligibility of the facility for priority selection, review, and documentation timelines under the responsible public entity’s guidelines; (v) local citizen and public entity comments; (vi) benefits to the public; (vii) the private entity’s compliance with a minority business enterprise participation plan or good faith effort to comply with the goals of such plan; (viii) the private entity’s plans to employ local contractors and residents; (ix) the safety record of the private entity; (x) the ability of the facility to address the needs identified in the appropriate state, regional or local transportation plan by improving safety, reducing congestion, increasing capacity, enhancing economic efficiency, or any combination thereof; and (xi) other criteria that the responsible public entity deems appropriate.A responsible public entity shall proceed in accordance with the guidelines adopted by it pursuant to subdivision 1 unless it determines that proceeding in accordance with the guidelines adopted by it pursuant to this subdivision is likely to be advantageous to the responsible public entity and the public, based on (a) the probable scope, complexity, or urgency of a project; (b) risk sharing including guaranteed cost or completion guarantees, added value, or debt or equity investments proposed by the private entity; or (c) an increase in funding, dedicated revenue source or other economic benefit that would not otherwise be available. When the responsible public entity determines to proceed according to the guidelines adopted by it pursuant to this subdivision, it shall state the reasons for its determination in writing. If a state agency is the responsible public entity, the approval of the Secretary shall be required as more specifically set forth in the guidelines before the comprehensive agreement is signed.

Interim or comprehensive agreements for maintenance or asset management services for a transportation facility that is a highway, bridge, tunnel, or overpass, and any amendment or change order thereto that increases the highway lane-miles receiving services under such an agreement, shall be procured in accordance with guidelines that are consistent with procurement through “competitive sealed bidding” as set forth in §

2.2-4302.1

and subsection B of §

2.2-4310

. Furthermore, such contracts shall be of a size and scope to encourage maximum competition and participation by agency prequalified contractors and otherwise qualified contractors.

The provisions of subdivision 3 shall not apply to maintenance or asset management services agreed to as part of the initial provisions of any interim or comprehensive agreement entered into for the original construction, reconstruction, or improvement of any highway pursuant to this chapter and shall not apply to any concession that, at a minimum, provides for (i) the construction, reconstruction, or improvement of any transportation facility or (ii) the operation and maintenance of any transportation facility with existing toll facilities.

Nothing in this section shall require that professional services be procured by any method other than competitive negotiation in accordance with the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.).

History.

1995, c. 647, § 56-573.1; 2002, cc. 570, 593; 2003, c. 968; 2005, cc. 504, 562; 2006, cc. 922, 936; 2013, c. 583; 2014, c. 805.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Editor’s note. —

Some of the opinions cited below were decided under prior law.

Responsible public entity. —

The Virginia Port Authority, pursuant to § 56-557, is the responsible public entity under the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (PPTA) for any concession of Port facilities because the General Assembly has conferred on it alone the power to develop and/or operate Port facilities and, as a result, the Virginia Port Authority bears statutory responsibility to review and evaluate the proposals received by private entities for the concession of Port facilities, and to do so according to any guidelines adopted by it pursuant to §§ 56-560 and 56-573.1. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012).

The Virginia Port Authority, as the responsible public entity under the PPTA, has the authority pursuant to §§ 56-560 and 56-573.1 to determine whether or not to select a preferred proposer with which to enter into negotiations for a comprehensive agreement for the concession to operate Port facilities. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012).

Under the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995, specifically §§ 56-560 and 56-573.1, the Virginia Port Authority, as the responsible public entity, has the authority to (i) approve entering into a comprehensive agreement, and (ii) subject to final approval by the Secretary of Transportation pursuant to subdivision 2 of § 56-573.1, execute a comprehensive agreement on behalf of the Commonwealth for the concession to operate Port facilities. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012).

Role of Secretary of Transportation. —

The selection of the preferred proposer remains in the discretion of the Virginia Port Authority as the responsible public entity, but the Virginia Port Authority may not sign a comprehensive agreement without first receiving the approval of the Secretary of Transportation as required by subdivision 2 of § 56-573.1. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012).

The role of Governor. —

The Governor, having supervisory authority over the Secretary of Transportation under subsection B of §

2.2-200

, may provide appropriate coordination and guidance as the Secretary of Transportation exercises his authority under subdivision 2 of § 56-573.1 to determine whether to give final approval before the responsible public entity signs a comprehensive agreement. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012).

Applicability of §

2.2-4321.2

. —

Section

2.2-4321.2

does not apply to contracts awarded under Virginia’s Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jennifer B. Boysko, Member, House of Delegates, 16-027, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 13 (8/10/16).